California statutes. Unemployment Insurance Code
(c) The panel may solicit proposals and enter into contracts or other agreements to secure funding for the purposes of this section, but those proposals, contracts, and agreements shall be exempt from any competitive bidding requirements otherwise prescribed in statute.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 3, Sec. 8.   (SB 104)   Effective March 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

10214.7.

The panel shall allocate funds available in the annual Budget Act for training programs designed for individuals who are eligible to receive benefits under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code or who have received CalWORKs benefits within one year of the commencement of the training program.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature in providing authority for these training programs that the panel allocate these funds in a manner consistent with the objectives of this chapter as provided in Section 10200.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, the eligibility criteria for individuals trained under this section shall be employment with an eligible employer as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 10201 and:

(1) Receipt of CalWORKs benefits at the time training begins, or

(2) Receipt of CalWORKs benefits within one year of the time training commenced.

(c) For purposes of this section, the panel may waive, if necessary, any of the following:

(1) The employer eligibility criteria outlined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 10200.

(2) The minimum training wage requirements pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 10201.

(3) The employment retention provisions specified in subdivision (f) of Section 10209 and instead require that the trainee has been retained in employment for a minimum of 90 days out of 120 consecutive days after the end of training with no more than three employers.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, the panel shall consider proposals that use innovative strategies and training options to enable current and prior CalWORKs recipients and eligibles to retain employment, including, but not limited to, projects that provide basic skills training.

(e) The panel shall adopt administrative procedures for approving and administering contracts under this section to expedite contracts, minimize barriers to completion of training, and facilitate the training of single trainees and small groups of trainees from one worksite.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 497, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

10214.9.

(a) (1) The panel may fund licensed nurse training programs to train individuals who are currently working as nurse assistants or caregivers in a health facility, as defined in Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that the panel allocate these funds in a manner consistent with the objectives of this chapter as provided in Section 10200.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, the panel shall waive the minimum wage provisions, pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 10201, if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The employee is enrolled in an approved licensed nurse training program that consists of not less than 1,000 hours of training.

(2) The employer pays the employee not less than 120 percent of the state minimum wage for not less than the first 20 hours of work per week during each week the employee is enrolled in the training program.

(3) Each program results in full-time employment customary for the occupation for which the individuals are being trained.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, the panel shall waive any limitation on the hourly length of training programs to allow approval and funding for up to 750 hours of a licensed nurse training program; provided, however, that those funds be used to pay for up to 750 training hours that remain in the licensed nurse training program after the employee has completed the first 800 hours of that program.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, employers that participate in the nurse training programs funded pursuant to this section, are not required to meet the eligibility criteria set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 10200.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 497, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

10215.

The funding of individual project grants by the panel may take the form of either direct grants to the employer or training agency, or credits to the employer’s liability for unemployment insurance contributions or reimbursements. Credits to the employer’s liability for unemployment insurance contributions or reimbursements shall be drawn from the Employment Training Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1074, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10217.

Funds in the Employment Training Fund created by Section 1610 shall be appropriated annually in the Budget Act by the Legislature for allocation by the panel for the purposes of this chapter, except those funds determined by the Legislature to be necessary to administer Section 976.6 and Article 6 (commencing with Section 1610) of Chapter 6 of Part 1 of Division 1 shall be appropriated to the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 41, Sec. 6.   Effective March 19, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Programs [10501. - 10501.]



  ARTICLE 1. Eligibility [10501. - 10501.]

10501.

Any public assistance recipient who successfully completes a job training program approved under this part shall be exempted from the payment of those fees normally associated with any examination or certification required by state law if the employment opportunity is for the job for which the recipient was trained.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1281.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.5. California Employment and Training Planning [10510. - 10533.]



  ARTICLE 1. Policies and Purposes [10510. - 10510.]

10510.

It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this chapter, to establish and implement a program of comprehensive and coordinated employment and training planning in California in accordance with the federal Job Training Partnership Act, as amended. The Legislature recognizes the need for a new employment and training planning structure which will provide for comprehensive analysis of alternative expenditure possibilities for the fiscal resources available in this field. The basic principles of the system are as follows:

(a) That the employment and training needs at the local, regional, and state levels, be addressed.

(b) That the expenditure of available funds meets the needs at the local level.

(c) That employment and training programs be integrated into a uniform employment and training services planning system within substate regions.

(d) That a uniform planning system shall coordinate employment and training programs and eliminate duplication of programs among state and local agencies.

(e) That decisionmaking be decentralized, insofar as is practicable, to the governmental level closest to the people.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1667, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. California Workforce and Economic Information Program [10529. - 10529.]

10529.

(a) The services provided by the existing labor market information system within the department shall include workforce and economic information that does all of the following:

(1) Provides data and information to the state Workforce Investment Board created pursuant to Section 2821 of Title 29 of the United States Code, to enable the board to plan, operate, and evaluate investments in the state’s workforce preparation system that will make the California economy more productive and competitive.

(2) Provides data and information for continuous strategic planning and the development of policies for the growth and
 competitiveness of the California economy.

(3) Identifies and combines information from various state data bases to produce useful, geographically based analysis and products, to the extent possible using existing resources.

(4) Provides technical assistance related to accessing workforce and economic information to local governments, public-sector entities, research institutes, nonprofit organizations, and community groups that have various levels of expertise, to the extent possible using existing resources.

(b) The department shall coordinate with the State Department of Education, the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, the State Department of Social Services, the California Postsecondary Education Commission, the Department of Finance, and the Franchise Tax Board in developing economic and workforce
 information. The department shall also solicit input in the operation of the program from public and private agencies and individuals that make use of the labor market information provided by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 31, Sec. 17.   (AB 119)   Effective June 29, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 20 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Coordination of Labor Market Information [10530. - 10533.]

10530.

It is the intent of the Legislature to establish a statewide comprehensive labor market and occupational supply and demand information system to coordinate the labor market information needs, including those specified in the statutes cited below, for the following entities:

(1) The Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges pursuant to its responsibilities under Sections 70901, 70901.5, 71050, 78015, and 78016 of the Education Code.

(2) The State Department of Education, pursuant to its responsibilities under Sections 321, 323, 332, 341, 343, 421, 422, and 423 of the federal Carl D. Perkins Vocational Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 2301 et seq.), and Sections 8031, 8081, 8500, 51228, 52300, 52301.5, 52302, 52302.3, 52302.5, 52304, 52309, 52381, 52519, 52520, 52910, 52911, and 52912 of the Education Code.

(3) The Employment Development Department, pursuant to its responsibilities under Article 1 (commencing with Section 1251) and Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 1266) of Chapter 5 of Part 1 of Division 1, Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 2051) of Part 1 of Division 1, Article 2 (commencing with Section 10521) of Chapter 4.5 of Part 1 of Division 3, and Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 15050) and Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 15075) of Division 8.

(4) The Employment Training Panel, pursuant to its responsibilities under Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 10200) of Part 1 of Division 3.

(5) The Department of Rehabilitation, pursuant to its responsibilities under Section 19152 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(6) The State Department of Social Services, pursuant to its responsibilities under Article 3.2 (commencing with Section 11320) of Chapter 2 of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(7) The State Job Training Coordinating Council, pursuant to its responsibilities under Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 10510) of Part 1 of Division 3, and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 15020.1), Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 15030), Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 15035), and Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 15075) of Division 8.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1667, Sec. 18.)
-------------------------------------------

10533.

(a) The Employment Development Department shall operate the State-Local Cooperative Labor Market Information Program as the primary component of the comprehensive labor market and occupational supply and demand information system described by Section 10530. The department shall consult with agencies listed in Section 10530 in the development and operation of this program.

(b) The objectives of this program shall be to produce, through extensive local participation and for distribution in effective formats to all local users, reliable occupational information, and to achieve cost-efficient production by avoiding duplication of efforts. The program shall be a primary source for local and statewide occupational information and shall be available in all labor market areas in the state.

(c) In producing this information, state and local agencies shall use state occupational forecasts and other indicators of occupational growth, combined with local employer surveys of recruitment practices, job qualifications, earnings and hours, advancement and outlook, to provide statistically valid occupational analyses for local job training and education programs.

(d) Local labor market information studies shall be conducted by the department or by a local entity and shall include the participation of local users of the information.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 208, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Employment Services for the Deaf and Hearing Impaired [11000. - 11006.]

11000.

The Legislature finds that over 1.5 million persons in California are deaf or significantly hard of hearing. Private and public employment agencies are not routinely adapted to meet the communication needs of persons who are deaf and hard of hearing and, therefore, the services they receive may be less than those provided to other persons. The Legislature also finds that employment opportunities for persons who are deaf and hard of hearing are increased when specialized counseling, interpretive, job placement, and followup services supplement conventional employment services.
 In addition, the limited programs
 that provide these specialized employment services to persons who are deaf and hard of hearing have recently been subject to significant local funding reductions. Therefore, the Legislature finds that a more stable funding source, as provided by this chapter, is necessary to ensure the continuance of these programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 94, Sec. 25.   (AB 1709)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

11000.5.

As used in this chapter “contractor” means a public agency or a private nonprofit corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1157, Sec. 1.   Effective September 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

11001.

(a) The department shall contract with public agencies or private nonprofit corporations for a period not to exceed one year to provide employment services for persons who are deaf and hard of hearing. These employment services shall be provided onsite at the department’s offices which are selected pursuant to Section 11004.

(b) At the end of each contract year, the department may renegotiate the terms of each contract in accordance with allowable increases or decreases in the contractor’s costs and the contractor’s demonstrated ability to provide the specified services.

(c) If a contractor is a private nonprofit corporation, it shall submit a complete financial statement audited by a certified public accountant prior to a renewal of the contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 152, Sec. 44.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

11002.

Employment services for persons who are deaf and hard of hearing shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(a) Complete communication services for all preparatory, job placement, and followup activities. The communication services shall include interpreter services by a professional interpreter for persons who are deaf and hard of hearing possessing the comprehensive skills certification of the National Registry of Interpreters for the Deaf or the equivalent, telecommunications, and, when necessary, training in communication skills.

(b) Advocacy to assure that persons who are deaf and hard of hearing receive equal access to public and private employment services.

(c) Job development and job placement.

(d) Employment counseling, including peer counseling by persons who are deaf and hard of hearing.

(e) Followup counseling and problemsolving after placement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 152, Sec. 45.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

11003.

(a) The department, with the advice of persons knowledgeable about providing employment services to persons who are deaf and hard of hearing, shall establish the criteria for choosing contractors.

(b) The criteria shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) The ability to provide services to a person who is deaf or hard of hearing in the person’s preferred mode of communication.

(2) The ability to secure community support, including written endorsements of local officials, employers, the workforce investment board of the local workforce investment area, and organizations of and for persons who are deaf and hard of
 hearing.

(3) The existence of funding from one or more public or private sources.

(c) Preference shall be given in the selection of a contractor to those proposals which demonstrate all of the following:

(1) Participation of persons who are deaf and hard of hearing on the potential contractor’s employment services staff, and in the case of a private nonprofit corporation, on the board of directors.

(2) A commitment to the development and maintenance of self-determination for persons who are deaf and hard of hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 251.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

11004.

The department shall do all of the following:

(a) Determine the number and location of its offices within the state providing employment services to individuals who are deaf and hard of hearing and decide which offices shall be served by contractors given the resources available under this chapter. The department shall give priority to offices where contracts are necessary in order to prevent or minimize the disruption or the discontinuance of employment services to individuals who are deaf and hard of hearing which have been provided in conjunction with the department
 before July 1, 1984.

(b) Coordinate the provision of employment services for individuals who are deaf and hard of hearing with the State Department of Social Services and the Department of Rehabilitation so that employment services provided by this chapter supplement or provide alternatives to services provided or funded by the departments.

(c) Establish uniform accounting procedures and contracts for use with regard to this chapter.

(d) Promulgate requests for proposals and conduct bidders’ conferences, and evaluate proposals according to the criteria established pursuant to Section 11003.

(e) Use
 the definitions of deafness and
 significantly hard of hearing that have been used or established by regulation by the State Department of Social Services.

(f) Conduct a management or fiscal audit of a contract whenever it is necessary for proper supervision of that contract.

(g) Annually consider incorporation of the services described in this chapter in the job service plan required by Section 8 of the federal Wagner-Peyser Act of 1933 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 49g).

(h) Assist contractors in maintaining all of the
 following information:

(1) The number of persons receiving services.

(2) A description of the services provided.

(3) The cost of the services provided.

(4) The number of persons placed in jobs.

(5) The number of persons assisted by followup activities.

(6) The number and qualifications of staff providing the services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 94, Sec. 27.   (AB 1709)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

11006.

The Employment Development Department shall not expend over 5 percent of the sum appropriated for this chapter for its administrative costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1157, Sec. 1.   Effective September 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Caregiver Training Initiative [11020. - 11024.]

11020.

(a) There is hereby established a project known as the Caregiver Training Initiative.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that the Caregiver Training Initiative develop and implement proposals to recruit, train, and retain health care providers such as certified nurse assistants, certified nurses, registered nurses, licensed vocational nurses, and other types of nursing and direct-care staff.

(c) (1) An advisory council is hereby established for purposes of the Caregiver Training Initiative.

(2) The advisory council shall develop goals, policies, and a general work plan for the Caregiver Training Initiative. For purposes of this paragraph, the advisory council shall consider the program model set forth in Section 11024.

(3) The duties of the advisory council shall include all of the following:

(A) Making recommendations regarding the identification of regions of the state for purposes of the initiative.

(B) Making recommendations to the Employment Development Department and the State Department of Social Services regarding the number of regional collaborative programs that should be funded under the initiative.

(C) Based on the number and size of the regions and programs to be funded, making recommendations to the Employment Development Department and the State Department of Social Services regarding the number of staff that should be assigned to the regions to assist in developing collaborative programs consisting of partnerships and funding proposals.

(D) Making suggestions and recommendations to the Employment Development Department and the State Department of Social Services with regard to the selection of the collaborative programs to be funded in each region under the initiative and of the contracts entered into between the state and the local agencies representing regional partners.

(E) Providing oversight of the progress of the initiative and identifying any needed corrective actions.

(F) Designating a member of the advisory council to participate in the work group established by the Employment Development Department, in conjunction with the State Department of Social Services, pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 11022.

(d) The advisory council shall consist of the following:

(1) Each director, or a designee of the director, of the following departments in the California Health and Human Services Agency:

(A) Employment Development Department.

(B) Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development.

(C) State Department of Social Services.

(D) State Department of Health Services.

(E) California Department of Aging.

(2) A representative from each of the following:

(A) County Welfare Directors Association.

(B) State Department of Education.

(C) Chancellor’s Office of the California Community Colleges.

(D) California Association of Health Facilities.

(E) California Association of Homes and Services for the Aging.

(F) American Red Cross.

(G) California Nurses Association.

(H) Service Employees International Union.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 108, Sec. 18.4.   Effective July 10, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

11022.

(a) (1) The Employment Development Department, in consultation with the State Department of Social Services, shall administer regional collaborative program selection and funding under the Caregiver Training Initiative.

(2) The Employment Development Department, in conjunction with the State Department of Social Services, shall establish and lead a work group that shall be responsible for staff support to the advisory committee established pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 11020.

(3) The Employment Development Department, in conjunction with the State Department of Social Services, shall be responsible for all of the following:

(A) Under the direction of the California Health and Human Services Agency, developing the criteria for regional collaborative programs, the number of staff to be assigned to regions, and the process for selecting regional collaborative programs to be funded.

(B) Assigning staff to each region to assist in developing collaborative programs consisting of partnerships and proposals for funding.

(C) Determining the date by which collaborative programs from each region shall submit their proposals for consideration.

(D) Selecting the collaborative program proposal from each region that best meets the criteria established by the department.

(E) Working with representatives from the health care provider and caregiver industries and labor, negotiating contract terms that best serve the initiative’s goals.

(F) Approving all contracts for participation under the initiative.

(G) Distributing funds to the appropriate local agencies to commence the regional collaborative programs.

(H) Providing staff support to the advisory council established under subdivision (c) of Section 11020.

(I) Carrying out state-level activities identified by the department that are necessary for the initiative’s success.

(b) The Employment Development Department, in conjunction with the State Department of Social Services, shall evaluate or contract for the evaluation of the regional collaborative programs funded under the initiative. The evaluation of each program site funded under the initiative shall include the following elements:

(1) A thorough assessment of implementation issues faced by grantees.

(2) An analysis, using appropriate statistical techniques, of identified outcomes of interest, including employment retention, advancement, earnings, and worker well-being measures.

(3) Annual population-based surveys of current and former CalWORKs recipients as they enter training programs and make choices about employment or subsequent job change.

(4) Identification and collection of well-being data regarding health care providers and caregivers and the recipients of their care.

(5) Construction and analysis of longitudinal administrative data.

(6) In-depth interviews with workers, staff, health care providers, and caregivers.

(c) The Employment Development Department shall develop a strategy to improve understanding of the demand and supply of labor, and the labor market dynamics for low-skilled workers who choose occupations such as certified nurse assistants. To develop the strategy, the department shall develop information about and analyze all of the following:

(1) Alternative occupations competing for available labor.

(2) The effect of conditions in other occupations using similar skill sets on the supply of labor in occupations related to health care providers and caregivers.

(3) Occupational ladders for health care providers and caregivers.

(4) The efforts by county welfare departments to increase interest in the health care provider and caregiver industry.

(5) Factors that draw individuals into or push them away from entering the health care provider or caregiver industry.

(6) Ways that nursing homes, long-term care facilities, and in-home care provider communities can improve the quality of employment of health care providers and caregivers.

(7) The treatment of staff in nursing homes and long-term care facilities.

(8) Worker compensation claims and claims of workplace violence due to patients with Alzheimer’s disease or dementia.

(9) Benefit packages.

(10) On-the-job training for career advancement as a health care provider or caregiver in nursing homes or long-term care facilities or advancement in fields related to an occupation as a health care provider or caregiver.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 108, Sec. 18.4.   Effective July 10, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

11024.

(a) The program model for implementation of the Caregiver Training Initiative shall consist of a solicitation and competitive selection process to identify proposals from regional collaborative programs that offer the best solutions to removing barriers for attracting and retaining qualified health care providers, such as certified nurse assistants, certified nurses, registered nurses, licensed vocational nurses, and other types of nursing and direct care staff.

(b) Proposals for funding under the initiative submitted by regional collaborative programs shall address all of the following topics:

(1) Marketing and outreach strategies that will attract eligible participants to begin careers in the health care provider industry and promote public awareness, especially among employers, to the opportunity to hire trained health care providers.

(2) Collaboration and agreements with state and local agency partners to help identify, refer, and provide services to eligible participants.

(3) Development and use of innovative training strategies, coupled with industry cooperation, to provide matching career paths that will enable participants to advance in the health care industry, including in nursing occupations such as certified nurse assistants, certified nurses, registered nurses, and licensed vocational nurses.

(4) Strategies for providing incentives to health care employers to hire program participants, such as taking advantage of existing tax credits, and incentives for participants to remain in and graduate from the program, such as postemployment training and support components.

(5) Leveraging additional resources to support activities that are not allowable with local welfare-to-work (Article 3.2 (commencing with Section 11320) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code) funds and Workforce Investment Act of 1998 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 2801, et seq.) funds and that will provide flexibility in serving participants.

(c) The regional collaborative programs that compete for contracts under the initiative may include partnerships of any combination of local governmental entities, private nonprofit entities, and employer or employee groups. In order to ensure oversight for funds used in these contracts, fiscal agents representing these collaborative programs shall demonstrate all of the following:

(1) The capacity to retain fiduciary responsibility for funds.

(2) That the fiscal agent was chosen by agreement of collaborating partners.

(3) Previous experience using public funds for similar projects.

(4) The ability to properly account for and administer funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 108, Sec. 18.4.   Effective July 10, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 6. WITHHOLDING TAX ON WAGES [13000. - 13101.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [13000. - 13019.]

13000.

The department shall have the powers and duties necessary to administer the reporting, collection, refunding to the employer, and enforcement of taxes required to be withheld by employers pursuant to Section 13020, except as otherwise provided by this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1007, Sec. 64.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 67 of Ch. 1007.)
-------------------------------------------

13001.

The definitions set forth in Sections 126, 127, 129, 133, 134, and 144 shall apply to this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1007, Sec. 64.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 67 of Ch. 1007.)
-------------------------------------------

13002.

The following provisions of this code shall apply to any amount required to be deducted, reported, and paid to the department under this division:

(a) Sections 301, 305, 306, 310, 311, 317, and 318, relating to general administrative powers of the department.

(b) Sections 403 to 413, inclusive, Section 1336, and Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 1951) of Part 1 of Division 1, relating to appeals and hearing procedures.

(c) Sections 1110.6, 1111, 1111.5, 1112, 1112.1, 1112.5,
 1113, 1113.1, 1114, 1115, 1116, and 1117, relating to the making of returns or the payment of reported contributions.

(d) Article 8 (commencing with Section 1126) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 1, relating to assessments.

(e) Article 9 (commencing with Section 1176), except Section 1176, of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 1, relating to refunds and overpayments.

(f) Article 10 (commencing with Section 1206) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 1, relating to notice.

(g) Article 11 (commencing with Section 1221) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 1, relating to administrative appellate review.

(h) Article 12 (commencing with Section 1241) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of
 Division 1, relating to judicial review.

(i) Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 1701) of Part 1 of Division 1, relating to collections.

(j) Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 2101) of Part 1 of Division 1, relating to violations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 117, Sec. 9.   (AB 1695)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

13003.

(a) Except where the context otherwise requires, the definitions set forth in this chapter, and in addition the definitions and provisions of the Personal Income Tax Law referred to and hereby incorporated by reference as set forth in the following provisions of the Revenue and Taxation Code, shall apply to and govern the construction of this division:

(1) “Corporation” as defined by Section 17009.

(2) “Fiduciary” as defined by Section 17006.

(3) “Fiscal year” as defined by Section 17011.

(4) “Foreign country” as defined by Section 17019.

(5) “Franchise Tax Board” as defined by Section 17003.

(6) “Spouse” as defined by Section 17021.

(7) “Individual” as defined by Section 17005.

(8) “Military or naval forces” as defined by Section 17022.

(9) “Nonresident” as defined by Section 17015.

(10) “Partnership” as defined by Section 17008.

(11) “Person” as defined by Section 17007.

(12) “Resident” as defined by Sections 17014 and 17016.

(13) “State” as defined by Section 17018.

(14) “Taxable year” as defined by Section 17010.

(15) “Taxpayer” as defined by Section 17004.

(16) “Trade or business” as defined by Section 17020.

(17) “United States” as defined by Section 17017.

(b) The provisions of Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) and Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, relating to the following items, are hereby incorporated by reference and shall apply to and govern construction of this division:

(1) Trade or business expense (Article 6
 (commencing with Section 17201) of Chapter 3 of Part 10).

(2) Deductions for retirement savings (Article 6 (commencing with Section 17201) of Chapter 3 of Part 10).

(3) Distributions of property by a corporation to a shareholder (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 17321) of Part 10).

(4) Deferred compensation (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 17501) of Part 10).

(5) Partners and partnerships (Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 17851) of Part 10).

(6) Gross income of nonresident taxpayers (Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 17951) of Part 10).

(7) Postponement of the time for certain acts by individuals in or in support of
 the Armed Forces (Article 3 (commencing with Section 18621) of Chapter 2 of Part 10.2).

(8) Disclosure of information (Article 2 (commencing with Section 19542) of Chapter 7 of Part 10.2). For this purpose “Franchise Tax Board” as used therein shall mean the Employment Development Department in respect to information obtained in the administration of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 50, Sec. 116.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

13004.

“Employee” means a resident individual who receives remuneration for services performed within or without this state or a nonresident individual who receives remuneration for services performed within this state and includes an officer, employee, or elected official of the United States, a state, territory, or any political subdivision thereof, or any agency or instrumentality of any one or more of the foregoing. “Employee” also includes an officer of a corporation.

Whether an individual provides equipment in the performance of services for remuneration shall not be considered in a determination of whether that individual is an employee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 847, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

13004.1.

“Employee” does not include any individual if all of the following conditions exist:

(a) The individual is licensed pursuant to the provisions of Part 1 (commencing with Section 10000) of Division 4 of the Business and Professions Code and is performing services in the capacity of a licensee, or the individual is engaged in the trade or business of primarily in-person demonstration and sales presentation of consumer products, including services or other intangibles, in the home or sales to any buyer on a buy-sell basis, a deposit-commission basis, or any similar basis, for resale by the buyer or any other person in the home or otherwise than in a retail or wholesale establishment.

(b) Substantially all of the remuneration (whether or not paid in cash) for the services performed by that individual is directly related to sales or other output (including the performance of services) rather than to the number of hours worked by that individual.

(c) The services performed by the individual are performed pursuant to a written contract between that individual and the person for whom the services are performed and the contract provides that the individual will not be treated as an employee with respect to those services for state tax purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 541, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

13004.5.

(a) “Employee” also means any individual who is an employee pursuant to Section 2750.5 of the Labor Code, of a person who holds a valid state contractor’s license pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code.

(b) When subdivision (a) does not apply, “employee” shall also mean any individual who is an employee, pursuant to Section 2750.5 of the Labor Code, of a person who is required to obtain a valid state contractor’s license pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 719, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

13004.6.

“Employee” does not include any member of a limited liability company that is treated as a partnership for federal income tax purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 122, Sec. 1.   (SB 1131)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

13005.

(a) “Employer” means any individual, person, corporation, association, partnership, or limited liability company, or any agent thereof, doing business in this state, deriving income from sources within this state, or in any manner whatsoever subject to the laws of this state, the State of California or any political subdivision or agency thereof, including the Regents of the University of California, any city organized under a freeholders’ charter, or any political body not a subdivision or agency of the state, and any person, officer, employee, department, or agency thereof, making payment of wages to employees for services performed within this state, except as provided in subdivision (b).
